Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.327

Required filings—Consent to service—Failure to comply—Rules—Fees.

(1) The director, by rule or otherwise, may require the filing of any or all of the following documents and the payment of the following fees with respect to a federal covered security under section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933:

(a) Prior to the initial offer of such a federal covered security in this state, all documents that are part of the current federal registration statement filed with the U.S. securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933, together with a consent to service of process signed by the issuer and the fee prescribed by RCW 21.20.340;

(b) After the initial offer of such a federal covered security in this state, all documents that are part of an amendment to a current federal registration statement filed with the U.S. securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933 and all fees prescribed by RCW 21.20.340; and

(c) An annual or periodic report of the value of such federal covered securities offered in this state, together with the fee prescribed by RCW 21.20.340.

(2) With respect to any security that is a federal covered security under section 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933, the director, by rule or otherwise, may require the issuer to file a notice on SEC Form D, together with a consent to service of process signed by the issuer and the fee prescribed pursuant to RCW 21.20.340, no later than fifteen days after the first sale of such a federal covered security in this state.

(3) The director, by rule or otherwise, may require the filing of any document filed with the U.S. securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933, with respect to a federal covered security under section 18(b)(3) or (4) of the Securities Act of 1933 and/or the payment of the fee prescribed pursuant to RCW 21.20.340.

(4) The director may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security, except a federal covered security under section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, if the director finds that there is a failure to comply with any requirement established under this section.

(5) The director, by rule or otherwise, may waive any or all of the provisions of this section.

[ 1998 c 15 s 12.]